Biker reacts lightning fast and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a traffic accident occurred on the highway between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was only slightly injured thanks to his rapid reaction.
Car driver overlooks biker
A 44-year-old driver wanted to turn left with her VW from Merklingen onto Landesstraße 1230 in the direction of Machtolsheim at around 9.30 p.m.
She overlooked the 24-year-old motorcyclist coming from Nellingen.
Hand and foot brake levers fly away in the collision
The biker tried to avoid the car, but still grabbed it at the rear of the vehicle.
Due to the stripping process, the hand and foot brake levers on the Suzuki were torn off and the driver was no longer able to brake.
At present, he steered his motorcycle in the green stiffnesses next to the road and let it roll out there without falling.
Biker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker suffered an injury to Beim and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona Mass Infection: 174 Harvester Infected
After a Corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming, Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are under quarantine and are no longer allowed to leave the company.
A security service monitors the ban.
A total of 174 harvesters were tested positive for the Corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2 during the series examination, as the district office Dingolfing-Landau announced on Saturday evening.
"In order to avoid further expansion, we unfortunately have to take this step to protect the population," explained District Administrator Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already become infected in the company - this was the occasion of the series test.
The farm is a large vegetable farm that grows strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetroot - but the cucumbers only for pickling glasses.
Mamming is a rural municipality with a good 3,300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to keep calm: "According to our information it is a closed group of people".
On the farm infected were separated from uninfected employees, the site is now surrounded by a barrier fence.
The Greens and the SPD shared responsibility for the state government.
The two opposition factions accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the control of seasonal workers.
"This can take bitter revenge if such local infection events have to be reached out and regional lockdowns have to be ordered," said Jürgen Mistol, the parliamentary managing director of the Greens.
The SPD sees this quite similarly: "After the Corona outbreak in the Wiesenhof slaughterhouse in mid-May, we have already called for a special control programme for farms with harvesters," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In our view, the hygiene conditions at the workplace and the living conditions need to be closely monitored.
This obviously did not happen. "
The outbreak came "with announcement".
Underground station Aidenbachstraße: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-old falls into the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at Aidenbachstraße underground station, a 19-year-old fell through a thrust and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday there was a dispute between two youth groups at the underground station Aidenbachstraße around 4.15 pm.
A passer-by alerted the police, who approached with several stripes.
According to the first investigation, a Munich (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the edge of the platform and fell into the track bed.
People from the 17-year-old group helped the fallen man climb out of the track.
There was no danger of an entering railway.
According to the police, there were clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old fled the scene, but his personal details could be determined in retrospect.
Accompanied by his father, he went to Police Inspectorate 29.
The 17-year-old is investigated for assault.
Report: Seehofer urges longer data retention
Data retention is currently suspended.
According to a media report, however, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer calls for an extension of the storage period.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
According to a media report, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for extended data retention - instead of the planned ten weeks for half a year.
As the "Bild am Sonntag" reports, Seehofer Minister of Justice Christine Lambrecht (SPD) asked in a letter for a quick change of law.
Seehofer therefore wants to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He considers it sensible "to make urgently needed adjustments to the law already now", quotes the newspaper from the letter.
Data retention is currently suspended.
A decision by the ECJ is expected to do so.
Seehofer, however, wants the amendments beforehand so that they could be applied immediately after a possible positive ruling, the report continues.
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it could only be sensibly examined whether legal adjustments were required if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with the interior ministers of the states, had already spoken out in June in favour of data retention.
NBA: Stripclub Trouble for Clipper Star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), professional basketball player of the Los Angeles Clippers, is said to have left the tournament quarter in Disney World in Orlando / Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit according to ESPN, is back in isloation, is tested daily on COVID-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as he is called in the NBA, has already expressed his love for these Wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta) have the best wings in town".
NBA insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that the NBA Williams has ordered a ten-day quarantine.
The Clipper star thus missed the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the top 22 teams with training games are preparing for the season finale starting on Friday night.
Söder comments on the Corona layer after mass infection
Munich - Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has startled authorities and politicians.
Almost 500 harvesters from several countries are currently working on the large vegetable farm, and more than a third have become infected with the Corona pathogen.
The farm is now under quarantine and is closed with a building fence.
No one is allowed to leave the grounds, food is delivered.
The authorities now offer free Corona tests to the 3,300 residents of the municipality.
Since the harvesters had little contact with the local population, the district office has so far assumed that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"remorse": confession of the alleged arsonist of Nantes
"My client was cooperative," lawyer Quentin Chabert told the newspaper.
The defender added, "He greatly regrets the deeds, the confession was a liberation for him."
His mandate was "plagued by remorse and greatly taken away by the extent of the destruction".
In the event of a conviction, the man is threatened with ten years imprisonment and a fine of 150,000 euros.
The Gothic St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes was severely damaged in a fire last week on Saturday night.
The fire broke out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests confirmed the suspicion of arson.
The suspect was arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after a day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the closure of the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of a violent penetration into the church, he quickly came into the sight of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking about abolishing the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss setting conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates fait accompli," said Grindel of Bild am Sonntag.
He stressed: "For the clubs that are most likely to become dangerous in Bavaria and Dortmund, the 50 + 1 rules do not work anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, one cannot avoid the debate as to whether it is not necessary to facilitate the involvement of investors for clubs that want to break into this phalanx. "
However, he has doubts as to whether there is a willingness in the German Football League to allow majority shareholdings, which are prohibited in the Bundesliga by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences around Bundesliga as a business location in a European internal market," said Grindel.
The former DFB boss sees the danger that "the attempts to ensure a more competitive balance in the Bundesliga only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level in the end, but do not lead to more tension in the championship".
Even an equal distribution of TV money would not achieve a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern generates sales of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
So the differences are immense among the first three clubs alone.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old.
With a view to the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there were people who noticed this mistake and stabbed the press instead of addressing it," said Grindel about accepting an expensive watch that led to his resignation in April 2019.
"That occupied me very much humanly".
He had received the gift worth around 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian official.
"I committed a compliance violation, and it was right to draw the consequences from it," said Grindel.
"I handled the ominous watch gift in a completely transparent and unsuspecting way.
Many in the DFB knew about it. "
He never "made a secret of the gift," assured the 58-year-old.
"This may be called naive, at least this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption."
"Black Lives Matter": injured and one dead
The protests against police violence in the United States have escalated again through Donald Trump's use of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, there were clashes between protesters and police officers in various cities.
Three people were injured in Louisville and 16 arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots while a demonstration march was crossing a crossroads.
Previously, there had been clashes again in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including federal police officers, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and forcibly dispersed demonstrators.
Hundreds, some armed protesters marched through Louisville, Kentucky on Saturday, demanding that those responsible for Breonna Taylor's death be held accountable.
The 26-year-old student was shot in March during a drug raid at her Louisville apartment.
The aim of the raid was someone else who did not live there, and no drugs were found.
On Saturday, when a member of a group called the Black American Armed Alliance fired a shot, three people were injured.
According to NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them were in mortal danger.
The police set up barricades because counter-demonstrators of a white militia had also formed.
The two groups ultimately did not meet.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and died during a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police claimed to have detained a suspect.
She has not yet given any further information on the circumstances of the act.
Mayor Steve Adler told the New York Times that, like many in the city, he was "inconsolable and stunned" because of what had happened.
Demonstrators also clashed with the police in the American metropolis of Seattle on Saturday.
They set fire to construction vehicles in front of a youth prison, the police used glare grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police or assault.
A courthouse was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of demonstrators hit windows, shot down fireworks and blinded police officers with lasers, the Oakland police said on late Saturday evening (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd demonstrating on a highway.
According to the police, one of the protesters fired a gun and at least one person was taken to the hospital injured.
In addition, windows were also hit in a court and a fire was set, as the police reported.
Investigations were started.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the big party was missing in the spa town, visitors and actors enjoyed the Rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: the Rakoczy weekend without Rakoczy festival.
But even if the big party mile in the city center was missing, the crowds and program highlights such as Saale, Rakoczy-Ball or Festzug, many got their money's worth with the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we have managed to spread Rakoczy flair," says spa director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one returns to the beginnings of the Rakoczy Festival, as well as the historical ones alone were the focus of the festival.
A pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has been visiting Bad Kissingen with her husband for more than 25 years.
So also this time in the Corona year.
The couple have made themselves comfortable at Luitpold Casino, watching the histories strolling and listening to Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I also find it so pleasant," says Konhäuser.
She does not miss the crowds that otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
But it lacks the usual program highlights, especially Saale burns on Friday evening as well as the historic procession and the final fireworks on Sunday evening.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy riding tournament to take place again
For the performers of the historical spa guests, the alternative program sometimes meant more work.
For example, for Christina Gold, who participates in the procession in a normal year and can be seen there on the carriage of the Kurgarten café.
This year she was on Saturdays and Sundays in costume on foot in the city.
"It's more strenuous, otherwise we'll have it easier," she says.
The equestrian club had less to do, even if individual riders were on the road in the park.
"We very much hope that the equestrian quadrille will take place again next year," says Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after a break of several years 2021, a Rakoczy equestrian tournament would take place again.
28 Corona cases at Spanish second division club Fuenlabrada
The Spanish second division football player CF Fuenlabrada is sliding deeper and deeper into the crisis due to a Corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer from the vicinity of Madrid flew to the city of A Coruña on 20 July despite the first Corona falls, one low follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been tested positive, one came to the hospital, as the club announced.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest of Madrid had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs.
Now even the relegation to the B group of the Second League threatens.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at the last moment, the prosecution investigated for a possible offense against public health, the Supreme Sports Authority CSD is considering the forced relegation of the club.
Players and other team members are quarantined in a hotel.
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they did not receive a fresh towel and gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
On photos you can see how players hung underwear and club clothes in their rooms in the hotel to dry, after they had to wash them themselves.
The bed linen was also not changed for five days.
Another problem is eating.
It was neither good nor sufficient, wrote "AS".
The club management, on the other hand, said that they were satisfied with the hotel.
The club's lawyer, Javier Tebas Llanas, rejected the charge of deliberately endangering public health.
The son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas, stressed that the news agency Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca" reported that no violations of the Corona rules established by the Football Association had been violated.
Before departure, there were four infected people until 19 July, all of whom were isolated and did not travel.
Directly before the flight to A Coruña on Monday, all players and team members were tested again.
When the team was already in A Coruña, "five or six" other team members of the Corona test were positive.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the kick-off, said Tebas Llanas.
Police have to catch horses torn out by steam
Two animals were on the road.
The police led her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning shortly before 6 o'clock a road user announced two free-running horses on the feeder between the junction Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the motorway junction Theres.
When the officials arrived, the horses were already back between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
Shortly before Dampfach, the officers won the trust of the horses, they had a rope carried in the patrol car folded.
professional cyclist Tony Martin: career continuation imaginable
Time trial specialist Tony Martin is thinking about continuing his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven-time time-trial world champion Tony Martin can imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am currently working with the team to define the framework conditions for how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung".
Martin is currently employed by the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had considered ending his career after this year before the Corona break.
Negotiations with his team were also about the number of race days, he said.
Or other problems that would plague him as a family father, Martin said.
He used to get up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Quickly back on the bike.
Today I think as the father of a small daughter: What if ".
The professional cyclist admitted that there are certainly aspects with which he is increasingly struggling.
"But it was good for me to notice from the Corona time what I have in cycling and how much fun I enjoy it".
The time trial specialist returns to the competition at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets on weekends
The beautiful weather attracts bikers to the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the tour by motorcycle ends fatally.
An 18-year-old pedestrian also dies.
Schönthal - In accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people, died on the weekend.
An 18-year-old motorcyclist was caught on Saturday near Schönthal (district of Cham) by a car that came on the countertrack.
It was initially unclear why the car came on the counter lane.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old collided on his machine with a horse-drawn carriage on Saturday.
According to the police, he was downhill at Beilngries.
In a left turn he collided with the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died at the scene of the accident.
Of the twelve inmates in the carriage, one man was seriously injured and one man slightly injured, the police reported.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad Kötzting in the Upper Palatinate.
He had laid down on a street on the night of Sunday and was overrun by a 42-year-old driver.
According to the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could not brake in time.
At Schönberg (district of Freyung-Grafenau), a 57-year-old biker hit a car in a right turn despite emergency braking.
He died at the scene of the accident.
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the remaining three people in the car remained uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria's Transport Minister Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests against driving bans announced for August, Gabor Kovacs, the minister referred to extensive investments such as underride protection on guardrails and the defusing of dangerous corners.
"We have achieved a lot for the safety of motorcyclists in recent years," the letter said.
"The number of motorized two-wheelers killed decreased by around 28 percent compared to 2011."
Kovac tests with Monaco against Frankfurt
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac there will soon be a reunion with Eintracht Frankfurt with his new club AS Monaco.
The eight-time French champion will perform on 1 August (6 p.m.) at the Hesse, the former club of the Croat.
For the Bundesliga club, it is the first and only endurance test before the return match in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because of the coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without spectators.
“We are especially looking forward to this game.
It is always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained Kovac.
Sporty, this is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Before moving to FC Bayern Munich, Kovac had trained Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led to victory in the DFB-Pokal.
“A top-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us in terms of the game against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt residents, I look forward to seeing Niko Kovac again, "said Eintracht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50-year-old Austrian had succeeded the Croat in Eintracht.
In March, the Frankfurter had lost the round of 16 first leg against Basel in their own stadium with 0: 3.
Almost 50 new infections: Landkreis Hof just past Lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of known new Corona infections has increased further on weekends: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person has recovered and no longer falls into these statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
In addition, there is a case in the city of Hof.
Thus, the Hof area is approaching the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in a week.
700 dead due to monsoon rains in Southeast Asia
The severe floods in Southeast Asia affect more than 9 million people, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
Due to the heavy monsoon rain, a total of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent tries to reach the isolated people in boats.
Whole villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their harvests.
Tank rhinos in national park die from landslides
In Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 rhinoceroses died from landslides.
They are protected and considered endangered by extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists attribute to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the countries most affected by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the village of Cox's Bazaar in southern Bangladesh, the state has built housing for 650 displaced by the floods.
Only a few have moved in so far.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazaar.
The enthusiasm in Grenezn also lasts.
Anyone who used to have a house, however small and like a hut, often does not want to spend his life in a large block of flats.
Many apartments are empty, but should - as the government wants it - soon be sourced from those who have lost their house due to the floods.
60 new Corona infections in just one day in Vienna
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 new Corona infections were reported in Vienna - in Lower Austria there were 22 new infections.
The Vienna State Medical Directorate and the Medical Crisis Staff of the City of Vienna regularly provide information on the current case numbers and other key figures for the COVID-19 virus: As of Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8 a.m., 4,840 (+ 60) positive tests have been confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths associated with the virus remains unchanged at 204.
4,090 (+ 48) persons have recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria rose by 22 to 3,288 on Sunday.
According to the medical staff, a patient has recovered anew.
This increases the number of people recovered to 2,936.
Currently suffering from COVID-19, 247 patients were in the state.
To date, 147,253 tests have been carried out.
105 people died in connection with lung disease.
Argentina rejects creditors' counter-offer
The new demands could not be met, the Ministry of Economy in Buenos Aires said on Saturday.
"That would not only be irresponsible, but also unjust," said a statement.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The debt of the second largest economy in South America is no longer viable on current terms.
This is why Argentina is asking its private creditors to dispense with some of their claims of around 66 billion US dollars (around 59 billion euros).
If no agreement is reached, the country is once again threatened with bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth default in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest rates on government bonds and changes to some contractual clauses.
However, the Argentine government is sticking to its last offer and is not willing to make any further concessions.
Argentina is in a severe financial and economic crisis.
The inflation rate recently exceeded 50 percent.
For the current year, experts expect economic power to decline by around ten percent.
At the end of May, Argentina had not paid interest claims of US $503 million and had thus slipped into a limited default.
Arriving professionally - not yet private
Dr. Stefanie Kramer concludes after her first days at the notary's office in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very fast: In mid-May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she would succeed Lutz Feller in the Eggenfelden notary's office.
Only six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the lawyer with a doctorate took up the work, the normal daily business has long been running at full speed.
"But I still have to arrive privately," she explains in an interview with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
Of course, the short lead time was not enough to move the center of life from Regensburg completely to Eggenfelden, reports the native Dingolfingerin.
She is currently looking for a suitable apartment or house in the city with her husband, who works as a judge at the district court in Regensburg.
At least her husband was still able to apply for parental leave at short notice in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order not to have to commute every day from Regensburg, she also has an overnight stay with her parents in Dingolfing, explains the 39-year-old.
Growing up in the neighbouring region, the town of Eggenfelden has of course long been known to her.
During visits on site with her family in recent months, she found out again: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all the more pleased that she had made the race in the selection process for the vacancy.
Her native Lower Bavaria also plays a central role in Dr. Stefanie Kramer's professional career: After studying law in Passau, she completed her legal traineeship and the 2nd state examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assessor, among others in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen in the Unterallgäu and Regensburg - during this time she also "incidentally" shouldered the doctorate in labour law - she took her first position as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau in 2012.
In 2016, she went on parental leave, followed by the move to Regensburg.
Since then, she has served in various notaries.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she saw the right time for full career reentry, explains the 39-year-old.
The team of their predecessor, who will take over the holiday representation in the notary's office in the future, has taken over Dr. Stefanie Kramer completely - and immediately has a praise for the team of the law firm ready: "It is going super well!"
The fact that she can rely on well-coordinated processes makes it easier for her to take care of the forthcoming relocation of the private centre of life.
In terms of kindergarten or crib places, she has already made contact with a local institution.
And if everything works as desired, she hopes to pursue her hobby soon - and get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans to start the league with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not even be filled by 20 percent at the start of the season in the event of a fan return.
"Due to the distance control, which is mandatory, we are currently planning with 12,000 to 15,000 spectators," said Borussia Dortmund's managing director Carsten Cramer to the "Tagesspiegel".
Normally, the arena in the district city holds just over 81,000 spectators at Bundesliga matches.
In the ghost games caused by the Corona pandemic last season, the BVB lost around four million euros per game.
The Cramer, who is responsible for marketing, digitization and internationalization at BVB, hopes that, in addition to the normal spectator seats, some of the approximately 4,000 seats in the hospitality sector can also be opened again: "It is, of course, a blow to the office if these revenues completely break away".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone is currently "well advised to take a stable page length".
"If many companies are not doing well and 6.8 million people in Germany alone are in short-time work, then the need for entertainment is limited," explained Cramer.
The Dortmund marketing boss praised the BVB professionals for their salary partial abandonment, which is intended to help overcome the crisis: "Of course, the players know that their salary waiver has a different effect than when we put 100 people who work in merchandising on short-time work".
Tiny wonders: Early start into life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a packerl of butter, just three tablespoons of blood in his entire body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The boy is one of about 400 premature babies who are cared for annually at the Graz Children's Clinic.
A quarter of them weigh less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme lightweight with less than a kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and born so early that neither lungs, nor intestines, nor muscles are fully developed.
Their skin is sometimes so delicate that they could hurt the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll clothing and specially made mini diapers for them.
But not so small that they are not in voice - "and how", smiles Berndt Urlesberger.
"Even if of course they don't scream as loud as big babies".
When the whiteboard becomes a stage
Despite Corona Theater in the classroom: The whiteboard as a stage experienced the 9th grade of the St. James Gymnasium in Abtsgmünd shortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen presented the production "Das Heimatkleid" to the students - via video.
Afterwards, the students were able to exchange views with the actress and the director Winfried Tobias about the play and the performance via Skype.
The idea for the performance format from the current corona situation was born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was happy about the enrichment of the lessons.
Even though everyone involved agreed at the end that the direct encounter in the theatre and stage space would offer additional stimuli, the theater also sees the potential for contact with the schools.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game," emphasised director Winfried Tobias.
First round drawn: TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in DFB-Pokal
Should TSV 1860 qualify for the DFB-Pokal, the lions will face Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponents in the first round of the DFB Cup have been chosen.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in a successful qualification.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening at the ARD sports show.
Because the field of participants is not yet complete due to the Corona pandemic, placeholders were used in the draw.
Due to the voluntary abandonment of semi-final opponents FC Memmingen, TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian Toto Cup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburg Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
Should runner-up Würzburg reach the final, Sixty would already be qualified for the first round of the DFB-Pokal.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against Regionalligist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB Cup will take place between 11 and 14 September, one week before the start of the Third Division.
"Gone with the wind": film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
Film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died a natural death on Sunday in Paris at the age of 104, confirmed her spokeswoman of the German Press Agency.
de Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the Southern epic "Gone with the Wind" (1939).
Born to British parents in Tokyo, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as a toddler.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia von Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream".
The film studio Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and brought her out big at the side of Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films with the heartbreaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the lead role of "To Each His Own".
The film was screened in Germany under the title "Mutterherz".
Three years later, the award for best actress came in William Wyler's "The Heiress".
She was also recognized as a neurotic eccentric in "The Dark Mirror" and "The Snake's Den".
Daphne du Maurier suggested it in 1952 for the lead role in the film adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play was a worldwide success.
With her longtime friend Bette Davis she played in "Wiegenlied für eine Leiche".
His marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 – 1953) produced his son Benjamin.
In Paris, de Havilland married journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had his daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage also broke up.
Rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath have never been confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / Wickler miss final at comeback
Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final of the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf they lost in the semi-finals to their national team colleagues Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen with 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Thole / Wickler last played at the World Tour Final in Rome last September.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerors Ehlers / Flüggen defeated the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde 0 – 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German championships were played at the beginning of September in Timmendorfer Strand: The tickets were secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Kalbitz ejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf"
The exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is from the point of view of the FDP only a "fig leaf" and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the tip of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said FDP politician Benjamin Strasser to the news agency dpa in Berlin.
The Federal Arbitration Court of the AfD had confirmed on Saturday in Stuttgart after several hours of trial the exclusion of Kalbitz, which the majority of the Federal Executive Board had decided in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD parliamentary group in the Brandenburg Landtag.
"If the AfD really wanted to systematically remove right-wing extremists from its party, functionaries such as Björn Höcke and his supporters would have been excluded long ago," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will for this in the AfD, because right-wing extremism is now part of the party."
CSU General Secretary Markus Blume said similarly: "The fact that Andreas Kalbitz is now excluded says nothing and does not change anything," he told the "Welt am Sonntag".
"It speaks rather volumes, how many frenetic supporters a right-wing extremist still has in the middle of the AfD".
Blume assumes that the AfD will land below five percent again in elections in the future.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are numbered".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state and group chairman Björn Höcke; the Verfassungsschutz classifies the coronation as "secured right-wing extremist aspiration".
In May, the AfD federal executive committee threw Kalbitz out of the party.
As a reason, he stated that Kalbitz had not indicated an earlier membership in the now forbidden far-right "Heimattreuen Deutschen Jugend" (HDJ) and among the Republicans.
Kalbitz denies membership in the HDJ.
The chairman of the left faction in the Brandenburg Landtag, Sebastian Walter, also stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court did not change the character of the AfD: "The wolf has only eaten chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without Kalbitz ".
Neither the federal party nor the right wing would be weakened with this decision.
"The manoeuvre of the Meuthen-troop is transparent.
One wants to avoid further observation by the Verfassungsschutz and tries to get through under the radar, "said Walter.
"The AfD will not get rid of the spirits it called.
A knockout does not change anything, "commented SPD General Secretary Erik Stohn on the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"Here the AfD state association and the faction held to this day as their right-wing leader".
The legal dispute over Kalbitz's membership in the AfD will continue.
He announced on Saturday that he would take civil action against the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court.
North Sea wind farms provide a good 21 percent more electricity
In the first six months of the year, the wind power plants on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours of electricity into the grid.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period last year, according to the network operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and the transmission through the German electricity grid.
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which are not part of Tennet's grid area, have fed in a further 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) of electricity.
Overall, wind power from the North and Baltic Seas will reach 13.73 TWh, compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea thus accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind current in Germany; that is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacities
In addition to the wind conditions, the increased contribution of offshore wind energy results from higher generation capacities, because new wind farms have been connected to the grid in the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea were all running at full speed at the same time, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
According to Tennet, the transmission capacity is 7.1 gigawatts.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we are investing 20 billion euros in the expansion of offshore grid connections," said Tennet Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms cannot exploit their capacity at sea, but reach around 40 percent.
The record day so far this year is January 2, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce around 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could supply almost seven million households with electricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130.
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold blew up the usual framework after the Corona break.
Much more art lovers than usual followed the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was provided by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern Kornhausplatz.
North of the gallery the association "Sandtogether" was involved.
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled due to Corona
The Windberg Festival does not take place this year.
The city of Freital cancelled the three-day festival planned in September.
In other years, more than 30,000 people had visited this city festival.
"We really did not make this decision easy and - aware of how difficult it is for the participants economically - we hoped until the last minute," explained Lord Mayor Uwe Rumberg (non-party).
"But ultimately we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people."
If tens of thousands had flowed into the festival grounds and into the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and contact tracking could not have been complied with in accordance with the current Corona Protection Regulation.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that there would not have been much left of a folk festival.
Moreover, the effort to organise and monitor would increase disproportionately many times over.
Rumberg consoled for next year.
Then the city of Freital celebrates its 100th anniversary with the Winterberg Festival from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of Saxony from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - The six-time Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg came to four victories at four starts on the weekend.
After winning a Grand Prix with Weihegold and Quantaz at the start, she was unbeatable on Sunday in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold Werth prevailed on Sunday in the special against the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen.
Also in the freestyle the German was on Saturday on Quantaz clearly in front of her 34 year old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Werth's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz it was the first freestyle ever.
Already at the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago Werth had won all important four tests.
The last of the three international tournaments is scheduled for 14 to 16 August.
More air traffic controllers in Worms
Worms University continues into the air: DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung endows a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially concluded for three years and will start in 2021.
With the professorship, it is possible to start studying not only in the summer semester, but also in the winter semester.
This means that twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities in the university as well as at the DFS air traffic control academy are utilized evenly.
DFS will advise the university on the establishment and appointment of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students are in the course of study Air Traffic Management as part of their training as air traffic controllers at Worms University of Applied Sciences.
This year, nine students started.
So far, the experiences of DFS are very positive, the achievements of the students are excellent.
The combination of study and pilot training makes a significant contribution to further increasing the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, funding is not easy for us economically.
However, we firmly expect air traffic to recover and grow again in the long term.
In order to be able to fulfil our legal mandate in the future, we need highly qualified personnel, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman Managing Director of DFS at the signing of the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a future-proof investment that will provide air traffic controllers with a broad, interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We are therefore continuing our good cooperation with the university and at the same time underpinning our attractiveness as an employer. "
This is also underlined by Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of Worms University of Applied Sciences: "The endowed professorship forms an important bridge between science and industry.
With it, we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor's degree programme in Air Traffic Management. "
The trust of the German air traffic control system is both a motivation and an obligation for the Worms University of Applied Sciences to further expand its teaching and research competence in the future fields of aviation.
In use for the air traffic controllers of tomorrow, the university could set very special highlights and innovative focuses for its students with the first endowed professorship for a dual course of study.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Continuing Education and Culture, emphasises: "Worms University of Applied Sciences has a unique selling point in Rhineland-Palatinate with its focus on aviation.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university ".
Rescue screwdriver lands on the A 45
The A 45 motorway was fully closed for about 30 minutes on Saturday afternoon towards Aschaffenburg, as the rescue helicopter was in use after a traffic accident.
A 76-year-old drove straight with a Ford at around 12.40 o'clock in the exit Alzenau-Mitte in the bend and landed at the guardrail.
Due to the impact, the front airbags triggered, the driver suffered minor injuries on the face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger were cared for by the emergency doctor and the patient was then flown to a hospital with the rescue helicopter.
At present, however, the police assume that there is no danger of death.
The damaged vehicle, which suffered damage of about 2000 euros, had to be towed away.
Heil wants to check other industries according to meat industry
The Corona crisis brought the conditions in parts of the meat industry to light again.
Tightening of the law is imminent.
But are they right - and will it stick to it?
Federal Minister of Labour Hubertus Heil (SPD) wants to check other sectors according to the now planned strict regulations against grievances in the meat industry.
"We will look at industry by industry and then take suitable measures for the respective industry if necessary," Heil told the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers are already warning against generally restricting contracts for works.
After the mass outbreak of Corona by the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabinet wants to pass a law of salvation this Wednesday.
Large slaughterhouses should no longer be allowed to employ external personnel in slaughter, dismantling and meat processing.
For this purpose, the use of work contract and temporary workers is to be banned there.
Employer President Ingo Kramer told the dpa: "Get away from a general restriction of employment contracts and temporary employment if you don't want to strangle the economy completely".
Work contracts are, for example, the basis for their added value at the customer for large areas of crafts, the construction industry and plant construction.
"The failures of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument".
Heil assured: "My goal is not to ban contracts for works everywhere in the German economy."
Work contracts make sense.
"When an industrial company orders a craftsman to install a safety system, it is a normal work contract."
The German meat industry considers a ban on contracts and temporary agency work to be unconstitutional in its industry alone.
It cannot be explained why portioning and packaging cheese should be subject to different labour law in the future than sausage, according to a statement on the bill, as the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday) reports.
In the case of a ban, the consumer price would rise by 10 to 20 percent per kilo per product.
Many Eastern European employees from contracting companies worked in the industry 16 hours a day according to the results of an examination by the NRW Occupational Safety and Health Administration.
Often they had no break.
Wage was withheld for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation in the accommodation of employees was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law had already entered into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, these were bypassed by "tricky constructions".
"Now it is necessary to clean up fundamentally".
The politician announced: "In the Occupational Safety and Health Act, which we want to pass in the cabinet at the end of July, there are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher test rates for occupational safety and health or clear criteria for community accommodation".
The draft submitted to dpa includes amendments to the Law on the Protection of Workers' Rights in the Meat Industry and the Occupational Safety and Health Act.
Brandenburg's Minister of Consumer Protection, Ursula Nonnemacher (Green Party), considers more intensive controls necessary.
"I would like us to be able to carry out even more controls in many supervisory areas: food inspections, animal welfare, everything possible, including animal transport, for example," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RBB programme "Brandenburg aktuell".
But more staff positions are also needed for more controls.
Three dead in crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
According to the police, three people died in the crash of an ultralight aircraft on an apartment building in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia.
A child was slightly injured.
Two other people were rescued injured in the accident, said a spokesman of the Wesel district control center.
According to the police, a parachute was found at the scene of the accident.
The "Rheinische Post" reported, citing eyewitnesses, that before the crash the aircraft had collided with a hot air balloon.
The house is a single or two-family house.
Further details were initially unknown.
Clearing of Frankfurter Opernplatz run peacefully
One week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacuation of Opernplatz took place peacefully in the night after Sunday.
Finally, several dozen people stayed on the square, but left it at 1 a.m.
The police have been deployed with numerous officers since the early evening, and there has been a large police force throughout the city.
For the first time this weekend from midnight, there was a ban on entry to the Opera Square, where there had been riots a week ago.
Police officers had been attacked with bottles from the crowd of the celebrants.
At least five officers were injured after police submissions, several police vehicles were damaged.
The night to Saturday had also remained quiet.
Car flips over: Young woman seriously injured in accident on federal highway 83 at Hofgeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old suffered serious injuries on Sunday at around 1.25 p.m.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
With thermal imaging cameras, the fire brigade searched for possible passengers.
According to the police, the woman was on Bundesstraße 83 in the direction of her place of residence Hümme, when her car came off the road for hitherto unexplained cause and flipped over several times.
In order to save the accidents, the fire brigade had to cut free the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether there was anyone else in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was searched from the turntable ladder with a thermal imaging camera.
The drone squadron from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, had also been ordered for the search for people.
However, the volunteers found no one between the tall corn plants.
The seriously injured man was taken to the Kassel hospital for further care with the ambulance.
Almost 50 firefighters from the Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg fire brigade were on site.
The highway was closed for two hours due to the accident.
Juventus Turin Champion in Italy
Turin - After a redeeming goal by Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus has secured the Italian championship for the ninth time in a row.
The team around the five-time world football player made the 36th Scudetto of the club's history perfect with a 2-0 (1-0) on Sunday evening in the home game against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1-0 ahead of half.
With 83 points, Turin, which competed without the last long-injured former international Sami Khedira, is not to be displaced from first place two matchdays before the end of the season of Serie A.
Inter Milan finished seventh in the standings.
Juventus was harmless despite optical superiority in the first half, then Ronaldo hit with the last action after a free kick variant.
The 35-year-old used Miralem Pjanic directly from the penalty area border with a flat shot (45 + 7).
Ronaldo was also involved in the 2-0 against the now more offensive guests, after his shot Federico Bernardeschi dusted (67th) off.
This ensured the lackluster but decisive success.
The foulelfmeter shot at the bar in the 89th minute should have hurt only Ronaldo himself with a view to the goalscorer classification.
"It's complicated to stay mentally and physically at ball level for 90 minutes.
The games are strange, and momentum is changing very easily, "said coach Maurizio Sarri after a 2-1 win at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the Juve coach.
Because of the defeat, the Turin team had not yet been able to make the championship perfect.
In the end, Juve was reassuring at the top of the standings, mainly due to the weakness of the competitors.
In the eleven games before the match on Sunday, the Sarri-Mannschaft had only managed five victories.
It is questionable whether Ronaldo will also become the top scorer.
While the Portuguese superstar has scored 31 goals so far, the former Dortmund Ciro Immobile has already scored 34 goals after his three-pack in the 5: 1 (1: 1) of the fourth place in the table Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona - as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title win of FC Bayern.
The record in Italy is held by the current juve pro Gonzalo Higuaín.
The Argentine scored 36 goals for SSC Naples in the 2015 – 2016 season.
In August, the next title chance awaits the "Old Lady" of Italian football.
Juventus is in the Champions League round of 16, but has to make up a 0 – 1 first leg against Olympique Lyon on 7 August to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round Real would wait Madrid or Manchester City as opponents.
Baden-Württemberg: Over 250 illegal car races recorded
Stuttgart - Despite all the punishments and court rulings threatened, motorists continue to accelerate countless illegal races on the Baden-Württemberg roads: last year and the first four months of this year, the police have already registered more than 250 illegal car races in the southwest.
Although there are no comparative figures for the years before, the speedsters are increasingly doing work to the judicial authorities: a total of 155 investigations were conducted at the prosecutors' offices between Konstanz and Mannheim in 2018 for illegal races, one year later there were already 252 and in the current year by the beginning of June already 151.
The races were less about organized events, as can be seen from the response of the Ministry of the Interior to a request from the Landtag SPD.
In most cases, the drivers spontaneously competed against each other or fled the police - this is also indicated as an illegal race.
German men between the ages of 18 and 60 sat at the wheel.
113 fines - 15 imprisonment
Only in comparatively few cases are the speedsters caught and also asked to pay: According to the Ministry of the Interior, a total of 113 fines have been imposed since 2018 and 15 prison sentences have been imposed.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races is actually increasing.
Rather, other drivers reacted more sensitively than before because of the many tragic accidents and processes of past years and reported more frequently, said a ministerial spokesman.
Especially popular with racers is the highway 8. Again and again, motorists there slow down the traffic to get space and use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen riders were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 riders on the A8 at Merklingen.
A81 is most popular "race track"
On the A81, the police register even more races than on any other motorway.
A speed limit is used to slow down the speedsters on the particularly affected section between Engen and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and pimped up sports and luxury cars often have Swiss license plates, because the drivers dodge to the lawn to Germany because of the high penalties for too fast driving and car racing in the neighboring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few distances: "With a general speed limit of 130 kilometers per hour, we would get rid of this problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD parliamentary group.
"The inhibition threshold for speedsters would be significantly higher if you were not legally on the road here and there with 200 kilometers per hour and more."
Rivoir thinks less of enlightenment or image campaigns: "Whoever disregards all rules in such a way and puts at risk not only his own life, but also the lives of other road users, is hardly achievable with reason".
ADAC calls for stronger police crackdown
On the other hand, this is not enough for the ADAC: "We assume that speedsters will not be deterred by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and Environment at ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and also tougher controls on the affected routes.
Not infrequently, the high-speed showdown becomes more painful and momentous: Since January 2019 and until April 2020, three people have died nationwide in the races, including two uninvolved in a nightly crash in Stuttgart's city centre and one in Gerlingen.
In November, two young men took part in a car race.
One of the vehicles came off the road, crashed against a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 more people have been injured in the races of the past two years.
According to Interior Minister Thomas Strobl, however, stricter penalties are not necessary: "Legislative action to sanction illegal motor vehicle races harder is not seen," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blue light from July 23: Thirsty burglar steals drinks from snack
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (Calw district) and stole drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds in Talstraße at around 3.40 a.m. and ran towards the snack bar.
There he noticed a man who used drinks on the fridge and then left the snack through a previously hammered entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the snack bar.
According to the police, the burglar also made use of a cash register and stole cash in the low three-digit range.
The suspect is described as follows: He is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and of strong stature.
In fact, he wore a black hoodie, black pants and light shoes.
The police accept further testimonies.
Ackermann jumps to victory on final stage at Sibiu Tour
Professional cyclist Pascal Ackermann won his second victory of the day on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Palatine from Team Bora-hansgrohe prevailed on the 109 kilometre long section with start and finish in Sibiu in the mass sprint, after he had already won a stage on Saturday.
There were three and four victories for Ackermann.
In the overall classification, his Austrian team mate Gregor Mühlberger prevailed.
The 26-year-old had confidently won the mountain time trial in the morning and thus took the lead in the classification.
Only 104 riders had entered the final stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season with a new victory," Ackermann explained after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters from the finish, he just put on his sprint, "and it worked out perfectly".
According to the rules of the UCI, a Corona test was carried out on all race participants and their companions six days before the start of the race.
During the entire tour, drivers and supervisors in isolated hygiene bubbles were separated from the organising team and the media.
Viewers at the start and finish were not allowed.
Control center gave instructions for amateur resuscitation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment building, a child (4) suddenly lay lifeless in the water while bathing.
According to the fire brigade, the emergency call was received at just before 1 p.m.
"A control center dispatcher immediately gave instructions for amateur resuscitation," a firefighter told IMAGE.
The incoming rescue workers took over the resuscitation measures shortly afterwards.
The child, who was in mortal danger, was transported to the university hospital under resuscitation.
Why it crashed is unclear.
The police have routinely started investigating the accident.
The fire brigade spokesman: "We assume a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - police intervene, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people took part in a "tuning meeting" in the parking lot of a furniture store on Saturday night.
The police implemented their announcement to intensify control of such events.
A large tuning meeting took place on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nuremberg, Südstadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the police of Middle Franconia, at around 10.30 p.m. the Nuremberg traffic police found an increased volume of vehicles in the area of a large parking lot in Ingolstädter Straße.
As a result, the police carried out a large number of vehicle inspections.
Only recently, the police had announced their intention to take more action against so-called autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only a small part from the "scene"
The officials counted a good 700 vehicles and about 1,100 people, the police take stock.
However, only a small part of those present can be assigned to the "autoposer" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene followed the appeal of the police.
On the basis of the vehicles and people on site, it can be assumed that these were mainly onlookers.
In addition, the majority of those present adhered to the applicable infection protection regulations, in particular compliance with the minimum distance and wearing a mouth-nose protection.
The on-site control measures were completed around 1: 00 a.m.
Altogether, the officials found such structural changes for 10 vehicles that the operating permit had expired.
Four of these vehicles had to be secured.
No car races
There were no illegal car races.
"The police headquarters in Middle Franconia will continue to keep an eye on what is happening and will continue to carry out increased control measures, also in connection with the emergence of onlookers," it said.
The agency News5 spoke with Jürgen Schrödinger from the towing company involved: "They all have beautiful rims, we must not scratch them," says Schrödinger.
Special tapes would be used for this.
Also because the cars are wider, the company must take care not to cause any damage.
"After all, the young people should get their cars back unscathed".
Employment Agency figures: 900 suspected cases of abuse of short-time work
Berlin - According to its own statement, the Federal Employment Agency (BA) investigates around 900 suspected cases of abuse of short-time work allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have indicated short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach, Member of the Executive Board responsible for the operational business of the Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung.
When many companies suddenly applied for short-time work at the beginning of the Corona crisis, the BA had to react quickly.
Usually the test lasts up to three weeks.
"So much time was not available to us in this hot phase.
We will take a closer look at the final accounts.
There will certainly be some more to come.
We are not naive and have a long breath. "
Evidence of abuse would often come from the employees or trade unions concerned.
In addition, the BA uses analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible wave of insolvencies in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments differ, but we prepare ourselves in the event of a case and already train our employees in the employment agencies for the processing of applications for insolvency money ".
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party dissolved in the New Garden
Potsdam - On Friday evening about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden.
The collection was dissolved at 8.48 p.m. by the territorial drivers of the Prussian Palaces and Gardens Foundation (SPSG), the foundation announced on PNN request.
The young people then left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would have played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow was cleared by territorial drivers, said SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
There are always illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks of the foundation, there are always accumulations in which the distance and hygiene rules COVID-19 contact regulation are not complied with.
At the end of June there was a celebration with about 300 people in the park Babelsberg, a week later about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without corona regulation, the parks are closed at nightfall.
The storage on the meadows is prohibited according to the park regulations, there are only a few exceptions.
The foundation has been complaining for a long time that visitors are leaving more and more garbage and destroying protected biotopes.
In Berlin, meanwhile, illegal park parties have reached another dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neukölln, 5000 people celebrated an illegal techno party on the night of Sunday.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona outbreak in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist resort of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases rose to 48, according to the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were still pending in the evening.
Accordingly, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has also been tested positive.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday night.
The curfew was set at 11 p.m.
"There are cancellations and cancellations there," said Hans Wieser, head of the Wolfgangsee Tourist Board, the dpa.
Some guests also left early.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 overnight stays last year.
In a normal season, about a third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday, the first infections became public.
The head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended on Saturday the behavior of the interns, who had celebrated in several restaurants and could have become infected there.
"We all liked to do that in our youth," he told the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The Tourist Board launched an information campaign to raise young employees' awareness of the dangers of COVID-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested.
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 July were contacted.
The outbreak evokes memories of the Austrian ski and party town of Ischgl in Tyrol, which was a centre of Corona spread throughout Europe in the early stages of the pandemic.
In Austria, more than 1500 people are currently infected with the virus.
The focus of the new infections is Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - English football record champion Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils secured third place in the Premier League by defeating direct competitor Leicester City 2 – 0.
The Foxes have to settle for the Europa League because Chelsea still passed and qualified for the premier class.
In the fight against the descent, Aston Villa was allowed to cheer.
Manchester United took the lead with a penalty from Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in extra time, Jesse Lingard (90th + 8) reached the final score.
Chelsea, in the Champions League round of 16 opponent of FC Bayern, won thanks to Mason Mount (45th + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45th + 4) parallel with 2-0 (2-0) against Wolverhampton Wanderers.
"That means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who is also in the FA Cup final against Arsenal in his first season as Chelsea coach.
Tottenham Hotspur also benefited from Chelsea's victory over Wolverhampton, which passed the Wolves with a meagre 1-1 (1-0) victory at Crystal Palace and finished sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the long-distance duel with Watford and Bournemouth, but had to tremble at West Ham United for a long time.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84.) immediately compensated Andrey Yarmolenko (85.).
Watford lost 2 – 3 (1 – 3) to Arsenal.
The club, which had three coaches during the season, was relegated after five first division years.
Just like Bournemouth, who could not save himself by a 3-1 (2-1) at Everton.
In the end, a point was missing.
Liverpool, which has been the English champion since the end of June, secured a club record with a 3-1 (1-1) victory at Newcastle United.
99 counters are the highest the Reds have ever achieved in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp and his team narrowly missed the points record in English football.
Manchester City holds the record with 100 points in the 2017 / 18 season.
After the Newcastle lead in the first minute Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59th) and Sadio Mané (89th) shot the game on Sunday for Liverpool.
"For this wonderful club it was an extraordinary season," said goalscorer van Dijk after the game, "which should encourage us to defend the title.
It will be difficult ".
In the end, the Premier League bosses should also be satisfied.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, football operations in England were interrupted from 13 March to 17 June.
In the meantime, even a premature termination or a holding of the remaining games on neutral ground was discussed.
In the end, however, the season could be played without special events - but as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrests and violence at demonstrations against Netanyahu
The protests in Israel against Prime Minister Netanyahu are becoming increasingly violent.
During the night there were violent clashes.
On the night of Sunday in Jerusalem, the Israeli police violently attacked participants in a demonstration against the right-wing conservative head of government Benjamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested for participating in riots, police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld said.
The police used water cannons to dissolve the rally.
According to media reports, a total of around 6,000 people gathered near Netanyahu's headquarters on Saturday evening.
They protested against unemployment, corruption and Netanyahu's handling of the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew horns, and called on Netanyahu to resign.
Participants in a counter-demonstration supporting Netanyahu were also arrested, the news site reported, "ynet."
People also demonstrated in many other places in Israel, including in front of the head of government's private villa in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
According to police, a man was arrested near Tel Aviv because he was suspected of spraying pepper spray on protesters on the roadside from a moving car.
Another man was arrested after a stabbing attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The protester was slightly injured in the neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv there have recently been several demonstrations against Netanyahu.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Netanyahu was also criticized for handling the Corona crisis.
Among other things, he is accused of premature relaxation and a lack of preparation for a second corona wave.
The Corona crisis has hit the country ’ s economy hard.
The unemployment rate was more than 20 percent recently.
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel has recently risen to new record levels.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter crashes on car - nine injured - Ruhrgebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A rear-end collision on Saturday afternoon on the B58 near Ahlen caused nine minor injuries.
A motorist was on the road with her two children (3, 5) towards Beckum.
The police: "Probably she had suddenly slowed down because she wanted to turn".
The driver of a Mercedes transporter who drove behind her must have seen this too late.
He crashed into the back of the car.
In the accident, three occupants in the car and six in the transporter were slightly injured.
Several ambulances took her to an surrounding hospital.
North Korea unlocks border town after Corona suspected case
North Korea has so far seen its own measures to ward off the coronavirus as a "brilliant success".
Now the country is reporting a suspicion for the first time.
Because of a first official Corona suspicion in the country, North Korea has completely sealed off a big city for fear of disaster.
Despite the strictest epidemiological defenses in the past six months, "the malignant virus may have been introduced into the country," the state media reported.
The state of emergency was imposed on the region around the border town of Kaesong.
The communist leadership proclaimed the highest alert level.
If the suspicion is confirmed, it would be the first official infection case with Sars-CoV-2 in the isolated country.
North Korea had not yet registered a single infection and described its defensive measures as a "brilliant success".
The information was doubted abroad.
The symptoms of the disease were reportedly found in a "runaway" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on July 19.
The person left for South Korea three years ago and has now returned across the border.
For the border crossing within the four-kilometre wide and largely mined military buffer zone, there was initially no confirmation from South Korea.
According to reports by the national news agency Yonhap, however, South Korea's military admitted the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea as high.
There were investigations into some people.
North Korea claimed on Saturday, on suspicion of an emergency meeting of the Labour Party's Politburo chaired by leader Kim Jong Un.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe."
Kim had already ordered on Friday as a preventive measure to "completely block Kaesong and isolate every district and region from others," it continued.
The person concerned, as well as all the people in Kaesong who had had contact with her, were quarantined.
The central military commission of the party should therefore investigate the "outbreak" as well as the behavior of the responsible military unit and, if necessary, impose severe punishment.
It is estimated that about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Tension before council meeting: City East and noise protection are still under discussion
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will also vote on the development plan for the major project Downtown Development East," says the central section of the municipal press release for the next municipal council meeting on Tuesday, 28 July, at 4.30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the Congress Centre Pforzheim.
In particular, the upgrading of the eastern city is controversial until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most recently even negative in individual committees depending on their presence.
Project opponent Reinhard Klein criticized an appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT), the project developed by the citizenry and then by the administration and the municipal council not to fail after almost ten years of preparation, as "extra-parliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "denigration" and "deliberate false statements".
"Everyone thinks they know better," says Klein, who has been a member of the municipal council for a year now as the only representative of the citizens' list Pforzheim.
In fact, after reading the contracts, he is in this position: "I know what I'm talking about".
The exit is cheaper for the city, the Technical City Hall is contrary to statements of the city administration after subsidies, of which Klein is convinced to renovate for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently than one predicts in the town hall and on the part of the proponents from the economy.
Designing the city by your own efforts and not an investor: That is his plan B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED faction, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also provides for the renovation of the Technical Town Hall, the keeping open of the Schloßberg, the rental of the Ex-Thal for administrative areas and a small-scale city redesign ideally with local carriers.
Environmental issues play a central role
In addition, environmental issues will play a central role.
Among other things, the municipal council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the population of Pforzheim from health noise pollution caused by road traffic, including frequent speed reductions.
In a press release, the local transport club Germany welcomes the widespread introduction of Tempo 30. However, the political leaders in the city are not innocent that this must come about because they have only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and thus noise by neglecting regular bus traffic with thinned cycles and by little commitment to cycling, according to the VCD.
The municipal council also votes on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda includes accession to the Baden-Württemberg Climate Protection Pact, the redefinition of parent contributions in the municipal day-care centres and the application for admission to the federal smart city funding.
Citizens are welcome, but must take Corona protection measures into account.
Tim Zimmermann starts the new season with a lot of delay
Tim Zimmermann will start his first season in the ADAC GT Masters on 31 July with almost half a year delay.
Before the league of supercars could start regular operation, the first test drives were scheduled.
For Zimmermann, it was all about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3 better.
The Corona crisis has long prevented Tim Zimmermann from embarking on his first race in Grasser Racing's new Lamborghini Huracan.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps at the Lausitzring and got used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different from the Porsche from the preseason," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example, you have to go into the curves differently.
But it was really a lot of fun ".
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite his only 25 years, the Dutchman is already experienced in GT sports and was able to help his new team-mate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also brings new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I get along brilliantly and we have also made enormous progress from session to session at the Lausitzring."
Exactly there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also host its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 supercars will race through Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 newcomers to the series, knows the track.
In 2015, he was a guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked quickly and I didn't have to get used to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafen race community Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to make to be fast".
How fast carpenter really is turns out in two weeks.
"Of course, the teams play a little poker in the tests," he says.
"In the end, however, we are very satisfied and look forward to the first weekend at the Lausitzring".
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelude to a densely packed calendar.
Seven races are scheduled until the beginning of November.
At the moment it is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, former Formula One driver Niko Hülkenberg will grab the GT steering wheel.
British transport minister caught cold by quarantine decision
The decision of the British government to quarantine Spanish holidaymakers for two weeks after their return caught the country's transport minister coldly, according to press reports.
According to this, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain, of all places, while his colleagues decided on the measure at home on Saturday.
Due to the rising Corona figures in Spain, the cabinet in London removed the country from the list of those countries from which entry without quarantine is possible.
The new scheme will apply from today, Sunday, so Shapps will also have to quarantine after his return.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures for returnees.
But the regulation applies to those who are just on holiday on the deadline, only from Saturday, August 1, and was not introduced overnight.
Spain, by the way, is still considered one of the "safe countries" for which no quarantine is required in Austria.
"Many ministers may have known in advance that there is a possibility that a quarantine will be imposed on holidaymakers Spain," commented Labour MP Diane Abbot.
"But apparently nobody bothered to let Grant Shapps know."
Less than a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the expiration of the strict curfew, the number of infections in the country is rising again.
Virologists are primarily responsible for the new spread of the nightlife.
Spain is one of the favourite holiday destinations of the British.
The British government is currently advising against unnecessary travel to mainland Spain, with the exception of the Canary Islands and the Balearic Islands, which are particularly popular with British holidaymakers.
To date, more than 272,000 infections with the novel coronavirus and more than 28,000 deaths have been recorded in Spain.
Russia: Marine Day: Putin announces hypersonic weapons for warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin has announced on Marine Day in his country an equipment of the warships with the most modern hypersonic weapons.
With these weapons, which are unique in the world, the fighting possibilities of the Russian naval forces would be expanded, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central naval parade.
According to the agency Interfax, the Ministry of Defense also informed about successful tests of the Zirkon hypersonic rocket built for the navy.
The hypersonic weapons have a multiple of the speed of sound of about 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo continues to be built
It was also said that the atomically usable underwater torpedo Poseidon would be built.
The planned straw is planned to destroy coastal targets.
The president, who himself also sailed with a military boat, said that this year alone 40 new ships would be put into service with the individual fleet units of the largest country on earth.
Russia has a coastal area as large as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the Navy has reliably protected Russia, Putin said at the nationally celebrated day of sailors.
The naval forces also celebrated Marine Day with parades in many other Russian coastal towns.
In Syria, where Russia is fighting alongside ruler Bashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated strength at a weapons show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu.
Ammunition was fired there.
A video published by the Ministry of Defense showed not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: Help made more difficult by Corona
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's season over the Atlantic has landed in Texas.
Life-threatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, according to the National Hurricane Center of the US climate authority NOAA on the night of Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared a state of emergency for many districts.
According to the US media, the corona pandemic rampant in Texas complicates the work of the helpers.
Evacuees called for caution
"Every hurricane is a huge challenge," Abbott said, according to the Houston Chronicle.
Facing the hurricane in Texas, he added, "This challenge is complicated and exacerbated considering sweeping through an area that is the state's most affected by COVID-19."
According to Johns Hopkins University, around 5,000 people have died in Texas alone as a result of the Corona pandemic.
Abbott called on people to leave their homes to be careful.
They should not disregard practices "to which we have become accustomed", such as wearing masks, the governor said, according to CBS.
It is important that everyone kept their distance.
Therefore, hotel rooms were also provided in some places.
In addition, emergency shelters on Corona should be tested.
Initially, only the coastal town of Port Mansfield was reported.
Storm warning withdrawn
With wind speeds of up to 150 kilometers per hour, "Hanna" was hit on land on the island of Padre Island just off the Texas coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the lowest level one hurricane.
For the coastal section from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm surge warning was issued and later withdrawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" moved inland and headed for northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" moves towards Hawaii
In the Pacific, Hurricane Douglas headed for Hawaii at winds of around 150 kilometres per hour on the night of Sunday.
However, the hurricane center expected it to weaken further.
According to the forecast, it should be near the largest islands of Hawaii on Sunday (local time) - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Over the Atlantic Ocean, NOAA expected an above-average hurricane season this year, according to a May forecast.
The authorities had declared that up to ten hurricanes could be expected from June to the end of November, of which up to six could be very strong cyclones.
On average, there are six hurricanes per year over the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great strength.
In view of available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and Caribbean, the probability of a normal season was only 30 percent, that of a below-average even only ten percent, it was said at the time.
US President Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that his administration was watching the storms closely and was in contact with the states concerned.
Four goals revoked: Video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were stripped of two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals revoked: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a raven black evening at the 0: 2 (0: 1) at the SSC Naples in the Italian football league Serie A - and was really angry at the video assistant of the referee.
"A festival of ungiven gates for Sassuolo.
The VAR has never done so hard against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Host Naples had taken the lead by a goal from defender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djuricic initially cheered on the balance.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) withdrew the hit due to an offside position.
Five minutes later Djuricic shot the ball into the net again - again the VAR intervened.
The goals of attackers Francesco Caputo (50th) and Domenico Berardi (61st) were also withdrawn by the referee team.
In the extra time Allan made the 2-0 final score for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo perfect.
"For Sassuolo, the VAR is worse than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology sets records, "writes Gazzetta dello Sport.
FC Bayern Munich: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start of the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began for double winner FC Bayern with a setback.
Hansi Flick, who recovered "reasonably well" after a short holiday and a few training days, has to consider after the first team training how he can rebuild his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes behind Captain Manuel Neuer and midfielder Joshua Kimmich, suffered a band injury at the left foot and threatens to be missing in decisive King's class duels.
In the Munich dirty weather, the right-back broke off a training game and was driven off the field with a golf kart.
How long the unrestricted regular player has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
A match in the second leg against Chelsea on 8 August should be difficult, the 24-year-old can hope for the final tournament starting on 12 August in Lisbon.
The Bavarians do not want to be stopped by the mishap from the training on Sunday.
In his personal triple formula, Flick named the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on his way to Portugal's capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration should show his victorious title collectors in the ideally following 28 days until the King's class final on 23 August.
"We simply mastered the mandatory tasks with championship and cup.
Now it is time to create something special, "said Flick.
Until the people of Munich can deal specifically with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, however, the round of 16 duty against Chelsea FC is pending.
After the 3-0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners in the domestic arena should not become a Bavarian nightmare again as in the lost "final dahoam" 2012.
"We have to go through the door first.
We want to win, create good conditions and trust with a good game, "demanded Flick.
A test to get in the mood is due on Friday against Olympique Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn his stars, who had 13 days of vacation after the Double, to a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players around Edel-Einkauf Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues on the pitch for the first time after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy fit in well like all the new ones," Flick reported.
But instead of talking about the new season, when Sané & Co. are no longer only allowed to train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, they are now trained in team strength for the Londoners, who are in contrast to the Flick ensemble in the playing rhythm.
After that, the people of Munich could face a quarter-final against FC Barcelona and Lionel Messi, in the semi-finals Real Madrid, Manchester City or Juventus are possible opponents.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not so easy", stressed the head coach, who can rely on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in training from Tuesday.
The World Championship record scorer Klose and Flick know of many a common tournament preparation, which is particularly important in the 0-on-100 tuning.
Flick praised working "a pleasure" with his current team.
The "focus on winning" is an impressive trait of his team.
At the tournament with nine-man teams, things went ambitiously on Sunday.
All of the performers were there, including Thiago and defender David Alaba, whose whereabouts are uncertain beyond the King's class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its world champion
Since it is not possible to drive on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Championship titles.
All American races were cancelled.
Race calendar is becoming more and more concrete
The race calendar of the current Formula One season continues to take shape.
In addition to the ten confirmed Grand Prix, three more race tracks were added during the week.
In October, the Nürburgring in Germany and Portimão in Portugal will be driven.
On the first of November, Lewis Hamilton and Co. will compete for World Championship points at the traditional Italian race track in Imola.
According to the current level, the 2020 race calendar thus comprises 13 races.
"We are pleased to continue to make great progress in completing our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula One boss Chase Carey.
A total of 15 to 18 races in the premier class of motorsport are to be completed in this extraordinary season.
Formula 1 wants to complete its season in Asia.
The final race calendar will be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Before the already officially targeted races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, media reports that performances in Vietnam and Malaysia could still take place at the end of November.
Regulations require races on three continents
However, the regulations of Formula 1 require at least races on three continents for the award of the World Championship.
Even if, as currently planned, only two continents are driven, there should be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the titles because of the coronavirus pandemic, citing "extraordinary circumstances".
The traditional start to the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled at short notice due to the looming corona crisis.
A return to the continent later this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be a guest in America this year.
Cancellation encounters criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being with them again next season," Carey said.
The rejection of the America races was met with criticism, especially in Brazil: "The rejection was not surprising for us, but we cannot accept the reasons for it," said Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
For example, the number of infections in the São Paulo area is significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams not to drive in Brazil would also justify no refusal.
One is prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil eye against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg talked about her meeting with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest on Stephen Colbert's well-known latenight show via video and revealed in an interview what she had in mind when she met Donald Trump.
Klimaatkivistin Greta Thunberg was a guest in a popular US latenight show via video.
Among other things, she told about her fight against the powerful of the world.
The teenager also talked about her famous "evil eye" when she met Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has attracted attention with her tireless commitment to the Fridays For Future movement.
Now she spoke in a well-known latenight show about her plans in the future as well as her meeting with US President Donald Trump at last year's UN climate summit.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed 17-year-old Thunberg to your show on Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swede.
She spoke not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world.
"There are some things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to steer the focus away from the climate crisis," she said.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats just because a group of children take to the streets" she experienced.
Heads of state and leading politicians who mock them on social media or even try to silence them find them "funny" because they show the reactions "because they have no other answer".
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview, when Greta Thunberg was approached about a well-known scene in which she gave US President Trump a bitter look.
At the 2019 UN Climate Summit in New York, for which the nude woman sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive gaze was captured by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip resulted in a GIF, an animated image that ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at this moment?
To Stephen Colbert's relatively open question, she answered only briefly and dry: "To be honest, I think there is no need for further explanation".
The experienced satirist Colbert had probably not expected the quick-witted answer and disappeared briefly laughing from the picture.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection, she was remembered by many at the climate conference.
Ex-Dortmund Immobile with triple pack for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now on top of Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski in the race for Europe's Golden Shoe.
The former Dortmund Ciro Immobile still has the best chance of becoming the top scorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB professional contributed three goals in the 5: 1 (1: 1) victory of Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona, including two converted penalty kicks in the extra times of both halves.
The 30-year-old now has 34 season goals on his account from the fourth in the standings two games of the season before the end - just as many Robert Lewandowski from FC Bayern Munich scored in the past Bundesliga season.
In Italy Cristiano Ronaldo follows with 30 goals so far, the Portuguese superstar met Sampdoria Genoa with the leader in the evening.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a rollercoaster ride: After a rapid climb with Fleetwood Mac it went steeply downhill and then slowly up again.
The blues rock guitarist Peter Green died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult pendant: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He died peacefully in his sleep at the age of 73, family members said in an official statement on Saturday that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians like Peter Frampton praised Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional response of a "monumental loss" for all former and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and the guitarist Green had founded the now legendary band in London in 1967, until today his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross" is unforgettable.
The life of the musician ("The End Of The Game", "In The Skies") was like a rollercoaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac Green experienced a rapid rise - but the band celebrated their greatest successes without him.
Among other things, there was controversy because Green wanted to donate all the group's profits to charity.
He began to perform in wide robes and with a large crucifix.
Psychological problems are also said to have played a role.
Three years after its founding, Green left the band in 1970.
This was followed by a social decline.
The blues rock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
Green was treated in psychiatry for a long time.
During much of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene.
He is said to have lived temporarily on the street, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent a while in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in Bethnal Green, London, the son of a Jewish working-class family.
At a young age, he became enthusiastic about US blues musicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven he learned the first guitar handles.
At the age of 15, the teenager began playing guitar professionally and five years later got the chance to be on stage as lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
Shortly thereafter, he was hired to replace his idol Eric Clapton with the Bluesbreakers.
In the midst of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac in the summer of 1967 along with his blues breakers colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross" composed by Green gave the group the first number one hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted it to the top of the British music scene.
But the rapid rise soon showed its downsides: Green could not cope with the media hype, his experiments with the drug LSD became more and more extreme.
He later commented on the life between music and addiction in an interview: "The worst thing that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best thing was to land a number one hit".
Towards the end of the decade, Green surprisingly achieved a respectful success in 1979 with an album inspired by religious themes.
Fleetwood Mac swam on a wave of success without him in a new formation.
Their 1977 album "Rumours" sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite various small solo successes, Green did not make a major comeback until he restarted in 1996 with a group of fellow musicians.
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke of a rock star returning to Earth.
Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group, until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts, he was already a blues legend during his lifetime - and with his gentle sound one of the most influential guitarists of the past decades.
